North Carolina, session 2025, SB1048.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-53.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-53.6. Titling of all-terrain vehicles vehicles, off-road motorcycles, and utility vehicles.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term "off-road motorcycle" means a
motorcycle, as defined in G.S. 20-4.01(27)h., designed exclusively for off-road use by an
individual rider with not more than two wheels in contact with the ground.
(b) Certificate of Title. – Any owner of an all-terrain vehicle, modified utility vehicle,
off-road motorcycle, or utility vehicle may apply to the Division for a certificate of title by
completing an application on a form provided by the Division and paying the fee established
under G.S. 20-85(a)(1). The application form shall require, at a minimum, the following:
(1) The owner's name.
(2) The owner's mailing address or residence address.
(3) A drivers license number, which shall be provided as authorized by
G.S. 20-52(a)(1a)b. or G.S. 20-52(a)(1b).
(4) A description of the vehicle, including the make and model.
(5) A statement of the owner's title and of all liens upon the vehicle, including the
names and addresses of all lienholders in the order of their priority, and the
date and nature of each lien. The provisions of this Chapter that relate to
perfection of security interests shall not apply to vehicles issued a certificate
of title under this section."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-54 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-54. Authority for refusing registration or certificate of title.
The Division shall refuse registration or issuance of a certificate of title or any transfer of
registration upon any of the following grounds:
…
(8) The vehicle is a golf cart. If the vehicle is an an: (i) all-terrain vehicle vehicle,
(ii) off-road motorcycle, a defined in G.S. 20-53.6, or (iii) a utility vehicle,
the Division shall refuse registration or any transfer of registration but shall
issue a certificate of title as provided by G.S. 20-53.6.
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2026.
*S1048-v-1*